District of Columbia statutes.
47-1712

Repealed

Secrecy of returns.

Repealed.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 675, ch. 690, title I, § 12
May 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 357, ch. 223, § 1(c)
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 18(g), 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334
Prisons, industrial work programs, taxable income, see § 24-231.11.
Relocation assistance, taxation of relocation and housing assistance payments, see § 42-3403.05.
1981 Ed., § 47-1712.
1973 Ed., § 47-1412.
D.C. Law 14-213 made a technical change in item § 47-1806.09b.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”